Utah statutes.
41-6a-307.   Flashing red or yellow signals -- Rights and duties of operators -- Railroad grade crossings excluded.

Except as provided under Section 41-6a-1203 regarding railroad grade crossing, the:

(1)  operator of a vehicle facing an illuminated flashing red stop signal used in a traffic-control signal or with a traffic sign shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering the crosswalk on the nearest side of the intersection, or if none, then at a point nearest the intersecting roadway where the operator has a view of approaching traffic on the intersecting roadway before entering;

(2)  right to proceed is subject to the rules applicable after making a stop at a stop sign; and

(3)  operator of a vehicle facing an illuminated flashing yellow caution signal may cautiously proceed through the intersection or cautiously proceed past the signal.

